Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.155

PASS program—High school completion account.

The high school completion account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations made by the legislature, federal funds, gifts or grants from the private sector or foundations, and other sources deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for proven dropout prevention and intervention programs identified under RCW 28A.175.135 and to make PASS program awards under RCW 28A.175.145. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2011 c 288 s 7.]